New Jersey, session 222, A230.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section, sexually explicit content" means  any description of, or any picture, photograph, drawing, motion picture film, digital image, or similar visual representation, depicting sexual bestiality, a lewd exhibition of nudity, sexual excitement, sexual conduct or sadomasochistic abuse, or fetishism. b. The Department of Education shall develop and make available to each board of education model policies for ensuring parental notification of any instructional material that includes sexually explicit content, and include information, guidance, procedures, and standards relating to: (1) ensuring parental notification prior to a students exposure to sexually explicit content in school curriculum; (2) directly identifying the specific instructional material and sexually explicit subjects; and (3) permitting the parent or guardian of any student to review instructional material that includes sexually explicit content and provide, as an alternative, nonexplicit instructional materials and related academic activities to any student whose parent requests those alternatives. c. Each board of education shall adopt policies that are consistent with, but may be more comprehensive than, the model policies developed by the department pursuant to subsection b. of this section. d. Nothing in this act shall be construed to provide for the censoring of books in public elementary and secondary schools. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year beginning after the date of enactment.